Maryland, session 2026, HB0428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–302.
(a) In this section, “former judge” means a judge who previously served in a court.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0428*

HOUSE BILL 428
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court of Maryland may assign any former judge to sit temporarily in any court if
the temporary assignment is approved by the administrative judge of the circuit in which
the former judge is to be assigned and if the former judge:
(1) Has served in the aggregate at least 2 years as a judge, except that in
Talbot County, the former judge shall have served in the aggregate at least 1 year as a
judge;
(2) Has been approved for assignment by a majority of the justices of the
Supreme Court of Maryland;
(3) Meets the standards established by this section as well as any
additional standards established by rule of the Supreme Court of Maryland; and
(4) Has consented to the assignment.
(c) A former judge may not be recalled for temporary assignment if the judge:
(1) Was removed or involuntarily retired from judicial office pursuant to
the Constitution or laws of this State;
(2) Voluntarily retired by reason of disability;
(3) Had the most recent service as a judge terminated by reason of defeat
for election to judicial office, UNLESS THE JUDGE PREVIOUSLY WON ELECTION TO
JUDICIAL OFFICE, or by rejection of confirmation by the Senate;
(4) Was censured by the Supreme Court of Maryland upon
recommendation of the Commission on Judicial Disabilities; or
(5) Is engaged in the practice of law.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.